California, session 20252026, AB1910.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 123577 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:123577. The department shall post information about pelvic floor therapy resources to a web page include on its public internet website relating to pregnancy and reproductive health. health information advising individuals to discuss any pelvic floor concerns with their health care provider during their postpartum care visit.